Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1561
Modular housing units; plumbing, heating, electrical, or construction codes; reciprocity; when; prohibited acts; agreements authorized.

If any other state has plumbing, heating, electrical, or construction codes for modular housing units at least equal to those established by the commission pursuant to the Nebraska Uniform Standards for Modular Housing Units Act, the commission, upon determining that such standards are being enforced by such other state, shall place such other state on a reciprocity list which shall be available to any interested person. Any modular housing unit which bears the seal of any state which has been placed on the reciprocity list shall not be required to bear the seal issued by this state. A modular housing unit manufactured more than six months after July 10, 1976, which does not bear the seal issued by this state or by a state which has been placed on the reciprocity list shall not be manufactured, offered for sale, sold, or leased by a manufacturer, dealer, or any other person anywhere within this state nor transported or delivered into any other state or jurisdiction.

The commission may enter into agreements with the federal government, any federal agency, or any other state, state agency, interstate agency, compact, or local jurisdiction to perform inspections pursuant to the federal government's or the agency's, state's, compact's, or jurisdiction's standards relating to modular housing units.

Laws 1976, LB 248, § 7;

Laws 1984, LB 822, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 67;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 95.